Louisiana, session 2026, HB426.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:107.3(B) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§107.3. Criminal blighting of property
* * *
B. Criminal blighting of property is the intentional or criminally negligent
permitting of the existence of a condition of deterioration of property by the property
owner, a representative or agent of the property owner, or anyone with custody,
control, or ownership of the property, which that is deemed to have occurred when
the property has been declared or certified as blighted or a public nuisance by an
administrative hearing officer acting pursuant to R.S. 13:2575 or 2576, or any other
applicable law.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-575 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 426